Utah statutes.
63J-3-205.   Monies excluded from the limitation.

Monies from the following sources are excluded from the revenues appropriated and used in determining a limitation:

(1)  monies received from the government of the United States including federal mineral lease payments;

(2)  monies received by the state from another unit of government, except the proceeds of taxes, fees, or penalties imposed by the state and collected by the other unit of government;

(3)  monies derived from the issuance of, or to pay interest, principal, or redemption premiums on, any security;

(4)  monies received from the sale of fixed assets or gains on fixed asset transfers;

(5)  the proceeds of contracts, grants, gifts, donations, and bequests made to the state for a purpose specified by the contractor or donor;

(6)  user charges derived by the state from the sale of a product or service pledged or legally available to repay any security or for which the quantity of the product or level of service provided to a user is at the discretion of the user; and

(7)  monies raised to meet fiscal emergencies.

